Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NEIGHBORHOOD DEVELOPMENT CENTER APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Neighborhood Development Center (NDC) to support small business programs, including training, lending, business services, and real estate initiatives. Money may be used to assist organizations outside of the seven-county metropolitan area with technical assistance and grants to help implement elements of NDC's small business support model; provide one-on-one technical assistance for entrepreneurs; and support the operations and marketing of a cybersecurity center. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel and is available for use in the second year. new text end